Utah statutes.
26-15a-107.   Duties.
Certified food safety managers shall:
(1)  establish and monitor compliance with practices and procedures in the
food service establishments where they are employed to maintain compliance
with department and local health department food safety rules; and
(2)  perform such other duties that may be necessary to ensure food safety in
the food service establishments where they are employed.
